District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-2411.01

Authority of Gallaudet University.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 781, Pub. L. 99-371, § 111
Oct. 1, 1992, 106 Stat. 2151, Pub. L. 102-421, § 101(a)(1)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1841.4.